Utah statutes.
17B-2a-305.   Fire protection districts board of trustees -- Board of a countywide district -- Validation of previous boards.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the board of trustees of a fire protection district may be appointed or elected, as provided in the documents establishing the district.

(2)  If the area of a fire protection district consists of all the area of a single county excluding the area of all first and second class cities in the county, the legislative body of that county shall constitute the board of trustees of the fire protection district.

(3)  The composition and method of appointing or electing board of trustees members of each fire protection district existing on April 30, 2007 are validated, ratified, and confirmed.

